Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1803
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 79-1804 to 79-1809 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 3.